Utah statutes.
17-22-9.   Federal prisoners.

Persons convicted of crime in any of the courts of the United States in the state of Utah as well as prisoners held to answer before such courts for a violation of any of the laws of the United States shall be received and held in the jail of any county under the same regulations and laws governing prisoners held under the authority of this state, and upon such terms as to compensation as may be agreed upon by the county and the United States.

